Hawaii statutes.
[§103F-202] Community council.
(a) There is established a community council on purchase of health and human
services. The community council shall be comprised of no more than nine voting
members, and one non-voting, ex-officio member of the interagency committee on
purchase of health or human services designated by the majority of the members
of the committee. There shall be a member from each county, except the county
of Kalawao, and up to five members interested in health, human services,
employment, or the provision of services to children and youth.

(b) Voting members shall be appointed by the
governor and serve for four years. Each voting member shall serve until the
member's successor is appointed. Section 26-34 shall apply insofar as it relates
to the number of terms and consecutive number of years a member may serve on
the council.

(c) Members shall serve without compensation,
but shall be reimbursed for actual expenses, including travel expenses,
necessary for the performance of their duties.

(d) The community council shall advise the
administrator about or assist the administrator in:

(1) Market or business conditions facing providers;

(2) Securing input from providers to facilitate
agency decision-making to assess needs, plan, budget, and purchase health and
human services;

(3) Facilitating provider participation in the
process used by state agencies to plan for and purchase health and human
services;

(4) Establishing schedules for planning and
purchasing health and human services in relation to the annual and biennial
budget cycles;

(5) Developing criteria to evaluate proposals to
provide health and human services, and for restrictive purchases under section
103F-403; and

(6) The needs of purchasing agencies and providers
for education and training to improve planning for or purchasing of health and
human services. [L 1997, c 190, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next